Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202687-1401
Agricultural Data Privacy Act, how cited.

Sections 87-1401 to 87-1410 shall be known and may be cited as the Agricultural Data Privacy Act.

Laws 2026, LB525, § 1.
July 18, 2026